Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-920
Department; contract for services.

The department may construct, lease, purchase, purchase on contract, utilize vendor payment, and contract for services connected with the operation of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act as needs and interest demand.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 5.